New York, session 2025-2026, A1579.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 7.09 of the mental hygiene law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision (n) to read as follows: 3 (n) The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations prohibit- 4 ing any suicide prevention or mental health services hotline operated or 5 sponsored by the state from being automated. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 7 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 8 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 9 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 10 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03336-01-5